Washington statutes.
RCW 8.12.480

Assessment fund to be kept separate.

All moneys collected by the treasurer upon assessments under this chapter shall be kept as a separate fund and shall be used for no other purpose than the redemption of warrants or bonds drawn or issued against the fund.

[ 1907 c 153 s 42; RRS s 9257. Prior: 1905 c 55 s 42; 1893 c 84 s 42.]